Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL DISTRICT FUND TRANSFERS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Bloomington. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.79, 123B.80, or 475.61, subdivision 4, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 271, Bloomington, may permanently transfer any balance from its building construction fund to the undesignated balance in the general fund without making a levy reduction, provided that the school board approves the transfer. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Brainerd. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.79, 123B.80, or 475.61, subdivision 4, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 181, Brainerd Public Schools, may permanently transfer up to $1,000,000 from its construction fund balance to its undesignated balance in the general fund for operational purposes without making a levy reduction, provided that the school board approves the transfer. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Ivanhoe Public Schools. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.79, 123B.80, or 142D.11, subdivision 9, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 403, Ivanhoe, may permanently transfer up to $68,000 from its early childhood education reserve balance in the community service fund to its undesignated balance in the general fund, provided that the school board approves the transfer. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin West St. Paul-Mendota Heights-Eagan. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.79, 123B.80, or 475.61, subdivision 4, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 197, West St. Paul-Mendota Heights-Eagan, may permanently transfer up to $4,500,000 from its building construction fund to the reserved account for operating capital in the general fund without making a levy reduction, provided that the school board approves the transfer. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Maple Lake Public Schools. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.79, 123B.80, or 475.61, subdivision 4, on June 30, 2026, Independent School District No. 881, Maple Lake Public Schools, may permanently transfer up to $1,800,000 from its building construction fund to the reserved account for operating capital in the general fund without making a levy reduction, provided that the school board approves the transfer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end